District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
21 act may be cited as the “Business Improvement District Modernization Amendment Act of
22 2026”.
23 Sec. 2. The Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective May 29, 1996 (D.C.
24 Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
25 (a) Section 3(17A) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.02(17A) is amended to read as follows:
26 “(17A) “Net rentable square feet” means the actual square footage of a building
27 that may be leased or rented to tenants reported to, or on record with, the Office of Tax and
28 Revenue. Where the Office of Tax and Revenue does not maintain or provide records sufficient
29 to determine net rentable square footage of a property at 90% of the gross building area, a BID
30 may calculate the net rentable square footage using a generally accepted real estate appraisal or
31 valuation practice, including records from a recognized mortgage lender, licensed appraiser, or
32 other commercially reasonable source as determined by the Office of Tax and Revenue.”.
33 (b) Section 8(a) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.07(a)) is amended to read as follows:
3

34 “(a) The powers of each BID corporation shall be vested in a Board of Directors (“Board”).
35 Board members shall include owners, or principals, agents, partners, managers, trustees,
36 stockholders, officers, or directors of owners, a resident who resides within the geographic
37 boundaries of the BID, and at least one representative of a certified business enterprise, as
38 defined in section 2302(1D) of the Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and
39 Assistance Act of 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 2-
40 218.02(1D)), that operates within the geographic boundaries of the BID.
41 (c) Section 9(b)(4) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.08(b)(4)) is amended to read as follows:
42 “(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter or a BID plan, a BID
43 may increase its BID taxes once annually, in accordance with subsection (b), by a percentage not
44 to exceed 5 percent. BID taxes may be amended no more than once annually, and increased rates
45 may only be collected if the BID is in compliance with the reporting requirements established by
46 section 14 for the most recent fiscal year.”.
47 (d) Section 9c (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.09c) is amended as follows:
48 (1) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “for newly enacted
49 BIDs”.
50 (2) Subsection (a) is amended as follows
51 (A) The lead in language is amended to read as follows:
52 “(a) An established BID may only expand categories of taxable real property if:”
53 (B) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “join the BID” and
54 inserting the phrase “join the BID, or the Board of Directors of a condominium association
55 governing a real property within the geographic boundaries the BID petition to join the BID” in
56 its place.
57 (C) Subparagraph(3)(C) is amended by striking the phrase “District of
4

58 Columbia;” and inserting the phrase “District of Columbia; provided, that a property subdivided
59 into separate condominium units shall constitute a single real property for purposes of this
60 subparagraph;” in its place.
61 (3) Subsection (c)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “Recorder of Deeds” and
62 inserting the phrase “Recorder of Deeds; provided, that any property subdivided into separate
63 condominium units shall constitute a single property for the purpose of determining the number
64 of taxable properties pursuant to subparagraphs (a)(3)(B) and (C) of this section; provided
65 further, that the condominium units shall constitute separate properties for purposes of assessing
66 and levying any BID charges” in its place.
67 (4) A new subsection (c-1) is added to read as follows:
68 “(c-1) Notwithstanding subsections (a)(3)(D), (a)(4), and (b) of this section, a BID may
69 impose BID taxes on Class 1A or Class 1B property as follows:
70 “(1) A BID that has the authority to impose BID taxes on Class 1A or Class 1B
71 property under title II prior to the effective date of the Business Improvement District
72 Modernization Amendment Act of 2026 shall have the authority to impose the tax rate then in
73 effect for nonexempt taxable Class 1A and Class 1B properties within the BID. Such rates may
74 be increased in accordance with section 9(b)(4).
75 “(2) A BID that does not impose BID taxes on Class 1A or Class
76 1B property as of the effective date of the Business Improvement District Modernization
77 Amendment Act of 2026 is authorized to impose BID taxes at a rate of $120 per unit annually or
78 such other rate as may be established pursuant to this Chapter for nonexempt Class 1A and Class
79 1B properties; provided, that for a residential unit restricted to residents based upon income
80 pursuant to a federal or District affordable housing program, the BID tax due on the unit shall be
81 computed by applying the percentage of area median income that an eligible household must
5

82 meet to participate in the affordable housing program for the unit to the amount of the BID tax
83 that would otherwise be due. Such rates may be increased in accordance with section 9(b)(4).”.
84 (e) Section 14 (D.C. Official Code § 2–1215.13) is amended as follows:
85 (1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “the Mayor” and inserting
86 the phrase “the Department of Small and Local Business Development” in its place.
87 (2) Subsection (b)(3) is amended to read as follows:
88 “(3) A performance report showing the results of the BID’s operations in
89 comparison to the goals and objectives established in its approved BID plan. The performance
90 report shall include:
91 “(A) For each applicable performance measure:
92 “(i) The prior-year result, if available;
93 “(ii) The performance target for the reporting year;
94 “(iii) The actual result for the reporting year;
95 “(iv) The year-over-year change, if applicable; and
96 “(v) An explanation of any material variance between the
97 performance target and actual result.
98 “(B) Performance measures within the following categories, to the extent
99 applicable to the activities and programs undertaken by the BID:
100 “(i) Cleanliness and public realm, which may include measures
101 concerning cleanliness, maintenance, beautification, streetscape conditions, public-space
102 improvements, or service response;
103 “(ii) Public safety and hospitality, which may include measures
104 concerning ambassador or hospitality services, public-safety activities, referrals, assistance, or
105 other activities intended to improve the experience of persons within the BID;
6

106 “(iii) Business and economic vitality, which may include measures
107 concerning business retention and attraction, business openings and closures, commercial
108 occupancy, economic activity, pedestrian or visitor activity, events, activations, or investment;
109 “(iv) Small and local business support and economic opportunity,
110 which may include measures concerning assistance to District-based businesses and certified
111 business enterprises, local procurement, workforce development, District resident employment,
112 internships, apprenticeships, or other economic opportunities;
113 “(v) Community and Stakeholder Engagement, which may include
114 measures concerning stakeholder participation, community meetings, surveys, complaints and
115 resolutions, engagement with Advisory Neighborhood Commissions or community
116 organizations, or stakeholder satisfaction; and
117 “(vi) Governance and Financial Stewardship, which may include
118 measures concerning BID tax revenue, expenditures, budget performance, administrative costs,
119 procurement, contracting, or other indicators of financial stewardship.
120 “(C) Each BID shall select performance measures within the applicable
121 core performance categories that:
122 “(i) Are reasonably related to the programs, services, goals, and
123 objectives contained in the BID’s approved BID plan;
124 “(ii) Are reasonably measurable using data available to the BID;
125 and
126 “(iii) Provide meaningful information concerning the BID’s
127 activities or results.
128 “(D) For each performance measure selected pursuant to subparagraph
129 (B), the BID shall report, to the extent applicable and reasonably available:
7

130 “(i) The prior-year result;
131 “(ii) The performance target for the reporting year;
132 “(iii) The actual result for the reporting year;
133 “(iv) The year-over-year change; and
134 “(v) An explanation of any material variance between the
135 performance target and actual result.
136 “(E) To the extent practicable, a BID shall identify whether a performance
137 measure represents:
138 “(i) An output reflecting the services or activities provided by the
139 BID;
140 “(ii) An outcome reasonably associated with a BID program or
141 activity; or
142 “(iii) A district condition or contextual indicator that may be
143 affected by factors outside the BID’s control.
144 “(F) Nothing in this paragraph shall:
145 “(i) Require a BID to undertake a program or activity for the
146 purpose of satisfying a performance category;
147 “(ii) Require a BID to report a performance measure unrelated to
148 its activities, programs, services, or approved BID plan; or
149 “(iii) Authorize the Department to prescribe the programs,
150 services, goals, or priorities of a BID.”.
151 (3) New subsections (f), (g), and (h) are added to read as follows:
8

152 “(f)(1) The Mayor, acting through the Department of Small and Local Business
153 Development, shall establish by rule a standardized framework for BID performance reporting
154 consistent with subsection (b)(3) of this section.
155 “(2) The framework shall:
156 “(A) Establish the core performance categories set forth in subsection
157 (b)(3);
158 “(B) Establish standardized definitions and methodologies for commonly
159 reported performance measures where standardization is practicable and would facilitate
160 meaningful year-over-year or cross-BID analysis;
161 “(C) Provide guidance and examples of performance measures that BIDs
162 may select within each core performance category;
163 “(D) Permit each BID to select performance measures appropriate to its
164 BID plan, programs, services, geographic area, size, and available data;
165 “(E) Permit BIDs to establish additional performance measures reflecting
166 local goals and priorities;
167 “(F) Provide for reasonable differences in reporting based upon BID size,
168 budget, programs, and availability of reliable data;
169 “(G) Minimize duplicative reporting and permit substantially equivalent
170 information already collected or reported by a BID to satisfy a reporting requirement; and
171 “(H) Facilitate meaningful year-over-year and cross-BID analysis where
172 the underlying measures and methodologies are sufficiently comparable.
173 “(3) The Department shall not require a BID to adopt a particular performance
174 measure solely for the purpose of facilitating comparison among BIDs where the measure is not
175 reasonably related to the BID’s programs, services, or approved BID plan.
9

176 “(g)(1) The Department shall maintain a publicly accessible BID performance dashboard
177 or other searchable electronic reporting system containing, at a minimum:
178 “(A) Each BID’s annual performance measures and results;
179 “(B) Year-over-year performance for measures for which comparable
180 prior-year data are available;
181 “(C) BID tax revenue and total annual expenditures;
182 “(D) Expenditures by major program area;
183 “(E) The BID’s current approved BID plan; and
184 “(F) The BID’s annual reports required by this section.
185 “(2) The dashboard shall allow the public to view information for each BID
186 individually and by core performance category. The Department may provide comparisons
187 among BIDs only where the underlying performance measures, definitions, methodologies, and
188 reporting periods are sufficiently comparable to permit a meaningful comparison.
189 “(3) The Department shall not rank BIDs based solely upon differences in
190 performance measures where differences in BID size, budget, geographic area, service
191 population, program responsibilities, or other material circumstances make such comparisons
192 misleading.
193 “(h)(1) The Department shall review each BID’s annual performance report for
194 completeness and compliance with this section.
195 “(2) If the Department determines that a BID has failed to provide
196 information required by this section, the Department shall notify the BID in writing of the
197 deficiency and provide the BID not less than 30 days to correct the deficiency.
198 “(3) The Department shall submit to the Council annually a summary of
199 BID compliance with the reporting requirements of this section, including any BID that has
10

200 failed to cure a reporting deficiency after receiving notice pursuant to paragraph (2) of this
201 subsection.
202 “(4) Nothing in this subsection shall authorize the Department to substitute
203 its policy priorities for the goals and objectives contained in a BID’s duly approved BID plan.”.
204 (f) Section 19 (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.18) is amended as follows:
205 (1) Subsection (a)(1) is amended to read as follows:
206 “(a)(1) Each BID shall have an initial term that shall end on the last day of the 5th full
207 fiscal year of the District during which the BID has been registered pursuant to section 7(h).
208 After a BID’s initial term, the BID may be extended for one 5-year term and, thereafter, for
209 successive 10-year terms, if:
210 “(A) The BID notifies the Mayor at least 180 days before the end of the
211 BID’s term that it desires to extend its status as a registered BID for a subsequent term;
212 “(B) The BID submits a plan for the next term of BID operations to the
213 Mayor; and
214 “(C) The Mayor holds a public hearing in accordance with this subsection
215 and subsequently issues a notice of BID re-registration.”.
216 (2) Subsection (b)(2) is amended as follows:
217 (A) Strike the phrase “each 5-year period” and insert the phrase “each
218 term” in its place.
219 (B) Strike the phrase “5-year term” and insert the phrase “5- or 10-year
220 term” in its place.
221 (g) Section 201(c)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.51(c)(2)) is amended by striking the
222 phrase “A 5% annual increase in the BID taxes over the current tax year rates specified in
223 subsection (a) of this section is hereby authorized and imposed subject to the requirements of
11

224 section 9(b).”.
225 (h) Section 203(c) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.53(c)) is amended as follows:
226 (1) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “5-year term” and inserting
227 the word “term” in its place.
228 (2) Paragraph 3 is repealed.
229 (i) Section 205(c)(2) D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.55(c)(2)) is repealed.
230 (j) Section 206(c) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.56(c)) is amended by striking the phrase
231 “properties; provided, that any change in the BID taxes from the current tax year rates shall be
232 made subject to the requirements of section 9 and inserting the word “properties” in its place.
233 (k) Section 207(c)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.57(c)(2)) is repealed.
234 (l) Section 208(c)(3) (D.C. Official Code §2-1215.58(c)(3)) is repealed.
235 (m) Section 210(c)(3) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.60(c)(3)) is repealed.
236 (n) Section 211(c)(3) D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.61(c)(3)) is repealed.
237 (o) Section 212(c)(3) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.62(c)(3)) is repealed.
238 (p) Section 213(c)(4) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.63(c)(4)) is repealed.
239 Sec. 3. Fiscal Impact Statement.
240 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
241 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
242 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
243 Sec. 4. Effective Date.
244 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
245 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of congressional review
246 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
247 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
12